Utah statutes.
17D-1-402.   Inapplicability of some requirements if petition is filed by all owners of taxable real property.

Notwithstanding Section 17D-1-401, the notice, hearing, and protest requirements of Part 2, Creating a Special Service District, do not apply if a petition to annex an area or to add a service to an existing special service district is filed with the legislative body of the county or municipality, as the case may be, containing the signatures of all owners of taxable real property:

(1)  within the area proposed to be annexed, if the petition is for annexation of an area to the special service district; or

(2)  within the special service district, if the petition is for adding a service to be provided by the special service district.

